apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="scunfigg/iri__vblex">
      	<e><p><l>iri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>iri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìri</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p></e>
    	
    	 <!-- Presento de Indicativo  -->
    	<e><p><l>iu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iemu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>inu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>iunu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>iunu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Imperativo -->
    	<e><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>issi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iemu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ìssiru</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>issiru</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	<e><p><l>ìssi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>ièmu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ìssiru</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        
        <e r="LR"><p><l>issi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iemu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>issiru</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>

    	 <!-- Imperfecto de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>ìa</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ia</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ivi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìa</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ia</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ìanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ianu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	 <!-- Two alternative forms: with "eva" and with "iva". Forms without accent accepted.  -->
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ieva</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iva</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ievi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ivi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ieva</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iva</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ièvamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìvamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ièvavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìvavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ièvanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ìvanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ievamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ivamu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ievavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ivavu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ievanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ivanu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Pretérito de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>ivi</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>isti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iemmu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iemu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ìstivu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>istivu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>istu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ièrunu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ienu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>iennu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Futuro Simple -->
    	<e><p><l>irò</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irrò</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>irai</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irrai</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>irà</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irrà</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iremu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irremu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>iriti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>irriti</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>irannu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>irrannu</l><r>iri<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Presente de Subjuntivo falta en Siciliano -->

    <e lm="scunfiggiri"><i>scunfigg</i><par n="scunfigg/iri__vblex"/></e>
